California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 8171, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 8171 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 21.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cancellations [8191. - 8191.]

8191.

If the department determines that any amount has been illegally determined to be due from any person either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department and the Controller. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 17.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Administration [8251. - 8277.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [8251. - 8258.4.]

8251.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part, except in so far as duties and powers are vested in the Controller, and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

The board may employ attorneys, accountants, auditors, investigators, and other expert and clerical assistance necessary to enforce its powers and perform its duties under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

8253.

The board may make any examinations of the books and records of highway vehicle operators/fuelers, industrial users, pipeline operators, suppliers, train operators, or vessel operators, and any other investigations as it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8254.

As this State is the source of petroleum products for other States, if such examination or investigation necessitates collaboration or conference with motor vehicle fuel tax officials of other States, at places inside or outside this State, such collaboration or conference is declared to be a necessary function in the administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 843.)
-------------------------------------------

8255.

(a) Upon request from the officials to whom is entrusted the enforcement of the motor fuel tax law of another government the board or the Controller may furnish to such officials such information in the possession of the board or the Controller which is deemed essential to the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws.

Any information so furnished shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which it was furnished.

(b) The
 board may furnish to any state or federal agency investigating violations of or enforcing any state or federal law related to motor fuels any motor fuel information in the possession of the board that is deemed necessary for the enforcement of those laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8256.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7651), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with the
 costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.

(a) The board shall determine which taxpayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A taxpayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.1.

A taxpayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the taxpayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The taxpayer’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The taxpayer’s business involves a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The taxpayer is taxed pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The taxpayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.2.

(a) If the board selects a taxpayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the taxpayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the taxpayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The taxpayer shall:

(A) Examine its books and records to determine if it
 has any unreported tax liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and books and records examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 3.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.3.

Nothing in the article limits the board’s authority to examine the books and records of a taxpayer under Section 8253.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 4.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the taxpayer in a manner to be determined by the board under
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 5.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [8260. - 8277.]

8260.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8261.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8262.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8263.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8264.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8265.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8266.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8267.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases that take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8268.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8269.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8270.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include motor vehicle fuel tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8272.

(a) The Controller shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) The Controller shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) This section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 141.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8273.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 142.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.

For the purposes of this part only, the board shall not revoke or suspend a person’s license pursuant to Section 7507 or 7508 unless the board has mailed a notice preliminary to revocation or suspension that indicates that the taxpayer will be suspended by a date certain pursuant to that section. The notice preliminary to suspension shall be mailed to the taxpayer at least 60 days before the date certain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8277.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test,
 or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose a
 penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Records [8301. - 8304.]

8301.

Every highway vehicle operator/fueler, industrial user, pipeline operator, supplier, train operator, vessel operator and every person dealing in, removing, transporting, or storing motor vehicle fuel in this state shall keep those records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers with respect thereto in that form as the board may require. Failure to maintain records will constitute a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 8402.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

(a) Each terminal operator shall keep the following information with respect to each rack removal of motor vehicle fuel at each terminal it operates:

(1) The bill of lading or other shipping document.

(2) The volume and date of the removal.

(3) The identity of the person, such as a common carrier, that physically received
 the fuel.

(4) The identity of the position holder or position holder’s customer.

(5) Any other information required by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Section 48.4101-1 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The terminal operator shall maintain the information described in this section at the terminal from which the removal occurred for at least three months after the removal to which it relates. Thereafter, the terminal operator shall retain the information at a location controlled by the terminal operator for at least four more years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

All records required by this chapter shall be available at all times for the inspection of the board or its representatives.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.

Upon demand of the board or its representatives a highway vehicle operator/fueler, industrial user, pipeline operator, supplier, train operator, and vessel operator shall furnish a statement under oath reflecting the contents of any records kept by the highway vehicle operator/fueler, industrial user, pipeline operator, supplier, train operator, and vessel operator with respect to the matters specified in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Distribution of Proceeds [8351. - 8360.]

8351.

The Controller shall transmit all money received by him or her in payment of taxes, interest, and penalties due under this part, and restitution orders or any other amounts otherwise authorized by law to be collected by the Controller, or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction to be paid to the Controller, to the State Treasurer who shall deposit it in the State Treasury and credit it to the Motor
 Vehicle Fuel Fund, which is continued in existence as the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, which fund is hereby created. All fees paid and accepted for issuance or reinstatement of licenses under this part shall be deposited by the board in the State Treasury to the credit of the same account.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Fund shall be deemed to refer to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the funds in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate
 determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.

Subject to the provisions of any budget bill heretofore or hereafter enacted, the money deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account is hereby appropriated for expenditure, allocation, or transfer as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 98.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.1.

The money deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account may be expended for the following purposes:

(a) To pay the refunds authorized in this part, including refunds due on account of judgments for the return of taxes illegally collected.

(b) To the Controller, to carry out any duties imposed upon him or her by this part.

(c) To
 the board, to carry out any duties imposed upon it by this part.

(d) To pay the pro rata share of the overhead and general administrative expense of the Controller and the board attributable to duties imposed by this part. The pro rata share is payable upon presentation of a claim against any appropriation from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account for the support of the Controller or the board, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.2.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the money deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account shall be transferred to the State Transportation Fund, which is hereby created, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.3.

(a) Subject to Sections 8352 and 8352.1, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), all moneys deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account attributable to the distribution of motor vehicle fuel for use or used in propelling an aircraft in the state shall be transferred to the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund, for allocation as follows:

(1) To pay the pro rata cost of the Controller and the board under subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 8352.1.

(2) To pay for the support of the Department of Transportation, for the administration of the State Aeronautics Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 21001) of the Public Utilities Code).

(3) Remaining balance to be available for expenditures in accordance with Section 21602 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 21680) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2012, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and Section 7361.1 and otherwise to be deposited in the Aeronautics Account pursuant to subdivision (a) shall instead be transferred to
 the General Fund. The revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and Section 7361.1 that were deposited in the Aeronautics Account in the 2010–11 and 2011–12 fiscal years shall be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 32, Sec. 30.   (SB 1006)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.4.

(a) Subject to Sections 8352 and 8352.1, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), there shall be transferred from the money deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, for expenditure in accordance with Division 1 (commencing with Section 30) of the Harbors and Navigation Code, the sum of six million six hundred thousand dollars
 ($6,600,000) per annum, representing the amount of money in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account attributable to taxes imposed on distributions of motor vehicle fuel used or usable in propelling vessels. The actual amount shall be calculated using the annual reports of registered boats prepared by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the United States Coast Guard and the formula and method of the December 1972 report prepared for this purpose and submitted to the Legislature on December 26, 1972, by the Director of Transportation. If the amount transferred during each fiscal year is in excess of the calculated amount, the excess shall be retransferred from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account. If the amount transferred is less than the amount calculated, the difference shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund. No adjustment shall be made if the computed difference is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and
 the amount shall be adjusted to reflect any temporary or permanent increase or decrease that may be made in the rate under the Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax Law. Payments pursuant to this section shall be made prior to payments pursuant to Section 8352.2.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2012, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and otherwise to be deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) shall instead be transferred to the General Fund.

(2) Commencing November 1, 2017, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7360, any adjustment pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7360, and Section 7361.2, and otherwise to be deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund pursuant to
 subdivision (a), shall instead be transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Fund to be used for state parks, off-highway vehicle programs, or boating programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 28.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.5.

(a) (1) Subject to Sections 8352 and 8352.1, and except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), there shall be transferred from the money deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, during the second quarter of each fiscal year, an amount equal to the estimate contained in the most recent report
 prepared pursuant to this section.

(2) The amounts are not subject to Section 6357 with respect to the collection of sales and use taxes thereon, and represent the portion of receipts in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account during a calendar year that were attributable to agricultural off-highway use of motor vehicle fuel which is subject to refund pursuant to Section 8101, less gross refunds allowed by the Controller during the fiscal year ending June 30 following the calendar year to persons entitled to refunds for agricultural off-highway use pursuant to Section 8101. Payments pursuant to this section shall be made prior to payments pursuant to Section 8352.2.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2012, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and otherwise to be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall instead be transferred to the General Fund.

(2) Commencing November 1, 2017, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7360, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7360, and Section 7361.2 shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(c) On or before September 30, 2012, and on or before September 30 of each even-numbered year thereafter, the Director of Transportation and the Director of Food and Agriculture shall jointly prepare, or cause to be prepared, a report setting forth the current estimate of the amount of money in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account attributable to agricultural off-highway use of motor vehicle fuel, which is subject to refund pursuant to Section 8101 less gross refunds allowed by the Controller to persons entitled to refunds for agricultural
 off-highway use pursuant to Section 8101; and they shall submit a copy of the report to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 29.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.6.

(a) (1) Subject to Section 8352.1, and except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), on the first day of every month, there shall be transferred from moneys deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund created by Section 38225 of the Vehicle Code an amount attributable to taxes imposed upon distributions of motor vehicle
 fuel used in the operation of motor vehicles off highway and for which a refund has not been claimed. Transfers made pursuant to this section shall be made prior to transfers pursuant to Section 8352.2.

(2) (A) Commencing July 1, 2012, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and otherwise to be deposited in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) shall instead be transferred to the General Fund.

(B) Commencing November 1, 2017, the revenues attributable to the taxes imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7360, any adjustment pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7360, and Section 7361.2, and otherwise to be deposited in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund pursuant to subdivision (a), shall instead be transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Fund to be used for state parks,
 off-highway vehicle programs, or boating programs.

(3) The Controller shall withhold eight hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($833,000) from the monthly transfer to the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund pursuant to paragraph (1), and transfer that amount to the General Fund.

(b) The amount transferred to the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as a percentage of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, shall be equal to the percentage transferred in the 2006–07 fiscal year. Every five years, starting in the 2013–14 fiscal year, the percentage transferred may be adjusted by the Department of Transportation in cooperation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Motor Vehicles. Adjustments shall be based on, but not limited to, the changes in the following factors since the 2006–07 fiscal year or the last adjustment,
 whichever is more recent:

(1) The number of vehicles registered as off-highway motor vehicles as required by Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The number of registered street-legal vehicles that are anticipated to be used off highway, including four-wheel drive vehicles, all-wheel drive vehicles, and dual-sport motorcycles.

(3) Attendance at the state vehicular recreation areas.

(4) Off-highway recreation use on federal lands as indicated by the United States Forest Service’s National Visitor Use Monitoring and the United States Bureau of Land Management’s Recreation Management Information System.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that transfers
 from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account to the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund should reflect the full range of motorized vehicle use off highway for both motorized recreation and motorized off-road access to other recreation opportunities. Therefore, the Legislature finds that the fuel tax baseline established in subdivision (b), attributable to off-highway estimates of use as of the 2006–07 fiscal year, accounts for the three categories of vehicles that have been found over the years to be users of fuel for off-highway motorized recreation or motorized access to nonmotorized recreational pursuits. These three categories are registered off-highway motorized vehicles, registered street-legal motorized vehicles used off highway, and unregistered off-highway motorized vehicles.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the off-highway motor vehicle recreational use to be determined by the Department of Transportation pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) be that usage by vehicles subject to registration under Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Vehicle Code, for recreation or the pursuit of recreation on surfaces where the use of vehicles registered under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code may occur.

(e) In the 2014–15 fiscal year, the Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall undertake a study to determine the appropriate adjustment to the amount transferred pursuant to subdivision (b) and to update the estimate of the amount attributable to taxes imposed upon distributions of motor vehicle fuel used in the operation of motor vehicles off highway and for which a refund has not been claimed. The department shall provide a copy of this study to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 30.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8352.8.
